tables/de-de-g2.ctb
# liblouis: German Grade 2 kurzschrift Table
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the Linux console (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. All rights reserved.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation.  Please see the file COPYING for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# German kurzschrift Braille Contraction Table
# Created by Tom Johnston <tom.johnston@accessabilityconsulting.co.uk>.

include de-de-g1.ctb

# the letter a
word aber 1
begword aber 2-1
always aberkennen 1-12-12456-13-14-1345-14
midendword ach 56
always anachronismus 235-1-1456-1235-135-1345-5-24
always ähnlich 345-456
begmidword al 25
always all 1-12345
#word all 1-12345
word alle 1-15
word allem 1-12356
sufword aller 1-12456
sufword alles 1-123456
#always allegorie 1-12345-15-1245-26-346
#always allegro 1-12345-15-1245-1235-135
#always allergiker 1-12345-12456-1245-24-13-12456
word als 146
word also 1-135
begmidword an 235
word an 235
always ander 2-12456
always änder 5-12456
begmidword ar 356
always arbeit 356-12
always seminarbeitrag 234-12356-35-356-2-12-2345-1245
midendword ation 5-1345
midendword ativ 5-1236
word auch 34
word auf 16
begword auf 2-16
#begmidword lauf 123-16-124
always beauf 23-2-16
always unauf 2-256-2-16
midendword inauf 35-2-16
midendword arauf 356-2-16
midendword erauf 12456-2-16
midendword sauf 234-2-16
begword absauf 1-12-234-16-124
begword besauf 23-234-16-124
midendword enauf 14-2-16
midendword emauf 12356-2-16
begword aus 34
begword australi 16-23456-1235-25-24
sufword auster 16-23456-12456

#the letter B
begmidword be 23
midendword ben 12-14
begword unbe 256-23
always vorbe 2-26-23
always nachbe 1345-56-23
always aufbe 2-16-23
always zube 2-1356-23
midword sben 234-23-1345
word benefiz 12-14-15-124-24-1356
always besen 12-123456-14
midendword ber 12-12456
sufword berg 12-12456-1245
word berge 12-12456-12346
sufword bert 12-12456-2345
sufword bern 12-12456-1345
midword sber 234-23-1235
midword sberg 234-12-12456-1245
midword enber 14-23-1235
midword enberg 14-12-12456-1245
midendword bell 23-12345
midendword bel 12-13456
#always liebelei 123-346-12-13456-346
word bei 12
always bei 2-12
begmidword beirr 23-24-1235-1235
word beige 12-146-12346
word beiges 12-146-1245-123456
word beigem 12-146-1245-12356
word beigen 12-146-1245-14
word beil 12-146-123
word beize 12-146-1356-15
begword beid 12-145
begword beidreh 2-12-145-1235-2356
word beim 12-134
#always beimischung 2-12-134-24-156-136
begmidword besonder 23
always besser 234-234
word bis 12-234
sufword bisher 12-234-125-12456
#always bischof 12-14-156-135-124
#word bison =
word bist 12-23456
always bleib 12-12
always blind 12-123
always brauch 2-34
always bräuch 5-34
always brief 12-124
always bring 12-1245

#the letter C
begmidword c 6-14
endword c 6-14
begmidword C 6-14
endword C 6-14
always charakter 1456-13
always ck 46

#the letter d
always dabei 145-12
always dadurch 145-145
always dafür 145-124
always dagegen 145-1245
always daher 145-125
always damit 145-134
always dank 145-13
always darauf 145-16
always darüber 145-1256
word das 145
word dass 2346
always davon 145-1236
sufword dazu 145-1356
always dazubleiben 145-1-2-1356-12-12-14
always dazumal 145-1-2-1356-134
word dem 12356
begword dem 2-12356
endword dem 2-12356
begword demo 145-12356-135
word demut 145-12356-136-2345
begword demüt 145-15-134-1256-2345
word diadem 145-24-1-145-12356
always democraat 145-2345
word den 15
word denen 15-14
sufword denn 145-1345
word dennoch 145-14-1345-1456
word der 1235
word des 3
always deutsch 145-156
word die 346
word dies 346-234
word diese 346-15
word diesen 346-14
word dieser 346-12456
word diesem 346-12356
word dieses 346-123456
#always diesseits 145-346-234-234-146-2345-234
#always diesbezüglich 145-346-234-23-1356-1256-1245-456
#always paradiesisch 1234-356-1-145-346-234-24-156
word dir 145-1235
word doch 145-1456
always druck 145-46
word durch 1456
begword durch 2-1456
endword durch 2-1456
always dürf 2-145

#the letter e
word ebenso 15-135
midword eh 2356
always ei 146
word Ei 6-146
always reimport 1235-15-24-134-1234-26-2345
always ein 1246
always koffein 13-135-124-124-15-35
always teint 2345-146-1345-2345
always einander 2-1246
always el 13456
always elen 15-123-14
always ell 15-12345
always beseelt 23-234-15-15-123-2345
always em 12356
always emm 15-1346
always gentleman 1245-14-2345-123-15-134-1-1345
always en 14
begword ent 2346
begword enten 14-2345-14
word Ente 14-236
begword enterb 2346-12456-12
sufword enter 14-2345-12456
#always entertainer 14-2345-12456-2345-1-24-1345-12456
always enthusiasmus 14-2345-125-136-234-24-1-234-134-136-234
always entropie 14-2345-1235-135-1234-346
always er 12456
always meer 134-15-15-1235
always es 123456
always esch 15-156
#always ess 15-234-234
endword est 15-23456
always west 2456-15-23456
word verwest 36-2456-123456-2345
endword verwest 1236-12456-2456-123456-2345
always rest 1235-15-23456
word test 2345-15-23456
always etwa 15-1
always etwas 2345-2456
begword ex 1346

#the letter F
always fahr 2-1235
always fähr 5-1235
always fall 124-12345
endword falls 124
endword unfalls 256-124-12345-234
always fertig 124-45
always folg 124-1245
always frag 124-1235
always fragile 124-1-1245-24-123-15
always fragment 124-1235-1-1245-134-14-2345
always suffragette 234-136-124-124-1235-1-12346-2345-356
always freund 124-145
always führ 124-125
word für 124
begmidword für 2-124
endword für 2-124
always fürchten 124-1256-1235-1456-2345-14
always fürst 124-1256-1235-23456
always fürth 124-1256-1235-2345-125

#the letter g
sufword ganz 1245-1356
always gänz 5-1245
always ge 12346
always gei 1245-146
midendword gen 1245-14
begmidword abge 1-12-12346
begmidword aufge 2-16-12346
begword ausge 34-12346
midword ausge 16-234-12346
begmidword einge 1246-12346
begmidword durchge 2-1456-12346
begmidword vorge 2-26-12346
begmidword unge 256-12346
midword ungen 256-2345-14
begmidword zuge 2-1356-12346
#endword gener 1245-14-12456
always dragee 145-1235-1-1245-15-15
#midword geh 1245-15-125
always gehen 1245-2356-14
word gehe 1245-2356-15
always gehst 1245-2356-23456
always gelee 1245-13456-15-15
word Gene 1245-14-15
word Gen 1245-14
begmidword genet 1245-14-15-2345
begword gener 1245-14-12456
midendword gel 1245-13456
midendword ger 1245-12456
#always gelb 1245-13456-12
#always geld 1245-13456-145
begword gern 1245-12456-1345
always geysir 1245-15-6-13456-234-24-1235
#always Ingenieur 35-1245-14-24-126-1235
word gegen 1245
begmidword gegen 2-1245
endword gegen 2-1245
always gegend 12346-1245-14-145
always gegenüber 1245-1256
always Gegenübertrag 2-1245-2-1256-2345-1245
always Gegenwart 1245-2456
always gegenwärt 5-1245-2456
always gelegen 1245-1245
always geschäft 1245-124
always gesellschaft 1245-156
word gewesen 12346
begmidword gewesen 2-12346
endword gewesen 2-12346
always geworden 12346-2456
always gibt 1245-12
always gleich 1245-1456
always GLÜCK 1245-46
always groß 1245-2346
always größ 5-1245-2346
always grund 1245-145
always gründ 5-1245-145

#the letter h
always hab 2-125
always häb 5-125
always haft 125-124
always häft 5-125-124
always hand 125-145
always händ 5-125-145
always hast 125-23456
always hat 125-2345
always hatt 125
always hattrick 125-1-2345-2345-1235-24-46
always hätt 345
always haupt 125-1234
always häupt 5-125-1234
midendword heit 125
always hoheit 125-135-125-146-2345
always heiter 125-146-2345-12456
always herr 1235-1235
sufword hier 125-1235
always hierarchie 125-24-12456-356-1456-346
word hoff 124-124
begmidword hoff 124-124
midword höff 5-124-124

#the letter I
word ich 3456
midendword ich 3456
#always ich, 24-1456-2
#always ich? 24-1456-26
#always ichthyologie 24-1456-2345-125-6-13456-135-123-135-1245-346
always laichzeit 123-1-24-1456-1356-2345
midendword ig 45
word ihm 236
#always ihm 24-125-134-3-234
sufword ihn 24-125
sufword ihr 24
midendword iell 24-15-12345
midendword ien 24-14
always daniel 145-235-24-13456
always gabriel 1245-1-12-1235-24-13456
always lini 123-35-24
always famili 124-1-134-24-123-24
always lili 123-24-123-24
always relief 1235-13456-24-15-124
always requiem 123-15-6-12345-136-24-12356
word im 36
word immer 1346
begword immer 2-1346
always immersion 24-1346-23456-234-245
always in 35
always mainz 134-1-24-1345-1356
always wiesenrain 2456-346-234-14-1235-1-24-1345
begmidword interess 2-35
midendword ion 245
always spion 234-1234-24-135-1345
always union 256-24-135-1345
sufword irgend 24-1245
endword ismus 5-24
always Kürbismus 13-1256-1235-12-24-234-134-136-234
word ist 23456
endword istisch 5-156
midendword ITÄT 5-345

#the letter j
sufword jahr 245-1235
endword jahr 245-1235
begmidword jähr 5-245-1235
sufword jahrhundert 245-125
sufword jahrtausend 245-2345
sufword jahrzehnt 245-1356
sufword jed 245-145
word jedoch 245-1456
sufword jetzige 245-45
word jetzt 245
sufword jetzt 2-245

#the letter k
word kann 13
always kapital 13-1234
begword kapitäl 5-13-1234
midendword keit 13
word komm 13-1346
word kommen 13-1346-14
endword kommen 13-1346-14
always kommens 13-1346-14-234
always kommend 13-1346-14-145
#begmidword komm 13-1346
#begmidword kommand 13-135-1346-235-145
#always KÖNN 2-13
always könn 2-13
always konnt 13-2345
always kraft 13-124
begmidword kräft 5-13-124
sufword kurz 13-1356
begmidword kürz 5-13-1356

#the letter l
sufword lang 123-1245
midword lang 123-1245
begmidword läng 5-123-1245
always  die\sStadt\sErlangen 346-0-23456-1-145-2345-0-12456-123-235-1245-14
always Langobarden 123-235-1245-135-12-356-145-14
word lass 2-123
begmidword lass 2-123
begmidword läss 5-123
always Blässe 12-123-345-2346-15
always Klassisch 13-123-1-234-234-24-156
always erblassen 12456-12-123-1-2346-14
always lasso 123-1-2346-135
word LÄßT 123
endword LÄSST 123-2345
sufword leb 123-12
midword leb 123-12
always kleber 13-123-15-12-12456
sufword leicht 123-1456
midword leicht 123-1456
always schleicht 156-123-146-1456-2345
always letzt 123-2345
midendword lich 456
always licht 123-3456-2345
midendword ll 12345

#the letter m
midendword mal 134
always dezimal 145-15-1356-24-134-1-123
always formal 124-26-134-1-123
always normal 1345-26-134-1-123
always schmal 156-134-1-123
word man 134
always mann 134-1345
always männ 5-134-1345
always manna 134-235-1345-1
always mannequin 134-235-1345-15-6-12345-136-35
always maschin 134-156
always material 134-123
always materiell 134-12345
word mehr 2356
begmidword mehr 2-2356
endword mehr 2-2356
sufword mir 134-1235
always mirakel 134-24-1235-1-13-13456
word mit 2345
begword mit 2-2345
endword mit 2-2345
always eremit 12456-12356-24-2345
always imitation 24-134-24-2345-6-1345
always mittag 134-24-2345-2345-1-1245
always mitten 134-24-2345-2345-14
always mitte 134-24-2345-236
always mitternacht 134-24-2345-2345-12456-1345-1-1456-2345
always mittel 134-2345
midendword mm 1346
begmidword möcht 1456
always mög 2-246
always möglich 134-456
always musik 134-13
sufword muss 134-2346
midword muss 134-2346
always Muße 134-136-2346-15
sufword müss 2-134
always müßig 134-1256-2346-45
